Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3304
Order; when not required.

No order shall be required or necessary where the individual has been lawfully arrested, nor under any circumstances where peace officers may otherwise lawfully require or request the individual to provide evidence of identifying physical characteristics, and no order shall be required in the course of trials or other judicial proceedings.

Laws 1971, LB 568, § 4.

Under this section, law enforcement personnel must have probable cause to believe that the person whose DNA is sought committed the crime for which the DNA is sought. State v. McKinney, 273 Neb. 346, 730 N.W.2d 74 (2007).

The identifying physical characteristics statutes require a showing of probable cause to believe the person seized has engaged in an articulable criminal offense before the judicial officer can issue an order to produce identifying physical characteristics. State v. Marcus, 265 Neb. 910, 660 N.W.2d 837 (2003).

When determining whether an order to produce identifying physical characteristics was based on a showing of probable cause, a court considers the totality of the circumstances. State v. Marcus, 265 Neb. 910, 660 N.W.2d 837 (2003).